Louisiana, session 2026, HB674.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:22.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§22.3. State involvement in local government economic development negotiations
A.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 44:22.2 or any other provision
of this Chapter to the contrary, records that are in the custody of a local government
that pertain to an active negotiation with a person for the purpose of a proposed
project involving the retention, expansion, or attraction of further economic
development within the local government's jurisdictional boundaries shall be made
available to Louisiana Economic Development.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-342 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 674
(2) A legislator shall be provided with the opportunity to participate in an
active negotiation for the purpose of a proposed project involving the retention,
expansion, or attraction of further economic development within a local
government's jurisdictional boundaries if the legislator's district is entirely, or in part,
within the jurisdictional boundaries of the local government undertaking the
negotiation.
B. For the purposes of this Section:
(1) "Active negotiation" or "negotiation remains active" means a negotiation
that has commenced concerning a project for the retention, expansion, or location of
a business within the jurisdictional boundaries of the local government and which is
not concluded when the local government receives a request for information or other
similar document concerning the project. For the purposes of this Section, a
negotiation is no longer active or is concluded when the local government decides
to no longer actively pursue the proposed project with the person, when the person
with whom the local government was negotiating decides not to pursue the proposed
project, or when a proposal affecting the negotiation is submitted to a public body
for consideration by the public body in a public meeting, whichever occurs earlier.
(2) "Economic development" means a project for which a company seeking
incentives commits to either:
(a) Creating or retaining at least fifteen permanent jobs for manufacturing
or distribution centers or at least twenty-five permanent jobs for digital media,
headquarters, research and development, or inbound call center operations.
(b) Having at least five million dollars in capital improvements.
(3) "Local government" means a parish or municipality.
C. The provisions of Subsection A of this Section shall not apply to any
application for a license or permit or to any record of negotiations concerning any
hazardous waste or waste site as "hazardous waste" and "waste" are defined in R.S.
30:2173.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-342 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 674